West Virginia, session 2026, HB4493.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 40A. The West Virginia Abolishment of Wholesaling Act. §30-40A-1. Definitions. (a) As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires: "Commission" means the West Virginia Real Estate Commission as established in §30-40-6 of this code; "Residential real property" means real property used for residential purposes with fewer than four dwelling units. "Wholesaling" means the practice of entering into a contract for the purchase of real property with the intent to assign, sell, or otherwise transfer the contractual rights to a third party for a fee or other consideration, without the wholesaler taking legal title to the property.  "Wholesaler" means a person who engages in wholesaling. §30-40A-2. Practice and regulation of wholesaling abolished. The practice and regulation of wholesaling is hereby abolished and wholesaling shall from this point onward be illegal in West Virginia. This practice does not include transactions where the purchaser takes legal title before transferring the property to another party. §30-40A-3. Remedies and civil penalty for unlawful wholesaling. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision contained in a contract for sale of residential realproperty, if any person engages in wholesaling, the seller may cancel the contract for sale at any time before the close of escrow without penalty and may retain any earnest money paid by the wholesaler.(b) Notwithstanding any other provision contained in the contract for sale, if any person engages in wholesaling, the buyer may cancel the contract for sale at any time before the close of escrow without penalty and must be refunded all earnest money paid.(c) Notwithstanding any other provision contained in the contract for sale, if any person engages in wholesaling, the buyer may bring a civil action against such person and may recover, in addition to actual damages, a civil penalty of 20 percent of the difference between (1) the sales price in the contract for sale and (2) the total consideration received by the wholesaler for assigning, selling, or otherwise transferring such contractual rights to a third-party.